 702  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 Few owners, however, willingly freed their slaves until forced to by the arrival of Union soldiers. A North Carolina planter pledged that he and other whites “will never get along with the free negroes” because they were an “inferior race.” Similarly, a Mississippi planter predicted that “these niggers will all be slaves again in twelve months.” At war’s end in the spring of 1865, Henry Adams left the Louisiana plantation where he had been enslaved “to see whether I am free by going without a pass.” A group of whites confronted him on the road, asked his owner’s name, and beat him when he declared that “I now belong to no one.” Some newly freed slaves rushed to give themselves new names to symbolize their changed status. Others left plantations and farms for towns and cities, where, as one of them said, “freedom was ­free-​­er.” The ratification of the Thirteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution in December 1865 was intended to end all doubt about the status of former slaves by abolishing slavery everywhere. Now the nation faced the huge task of “reconstructing” and reuniting a ­war-​­ravaged South while transforming ­ex-​ ­slaves into free workers and equal citizens. It would not be easy. Freedom did not bring independence or s­ elf-​­reliance for millions of former slaves. At the same time, many white southerners resented and resisted efforts to “reconstruct” their region. As a South Carolina planter told a federal official in the fall of 1865, “The war is not over.” During the Reconstruction era, from 1865 to 1877, political leaders wrestled with how best to bring the Confederate states back into the Union and how best to help former slaves make the transition from bondage to citizenship. Those turbulent years witnessed a complex debate about the role of the federal government in ensuring civil rights. Some northerners wanted the former Confederate states returned to the Union with little or no changes in their social, political, and economic life. Others called for former Confederate political and military leaders to be imprisoned or executed and the South rebuilt in the image of the rest of the nation. The editors of the nation’s most popular magazine, Harper’s Weekly, expressed this vengeful attitude when they declared that “the ­forgive-​­and-​ ­forget policy . . . is mere political insanity and suicide.” Although the Reconstruction era lasted only twelve years, it was one of the most significant periods in U.S. history. At the center of the debate over how best to restore the Union were questions of continuing significance: Who is deserving of citizenship and what does it entail? What rights should all Americans enjoy? What role should the federal government play in ensuring freedom and equality? Those questions are still shaping American life nearly 150 years later.

 The War’s Aftermath in the South  703

 The War’s Aftermath in the South The postwar South presented a sharp contrast to the victorious North, where the economy had been strengthened by the war efforts. Between 1860 and 1870, northern wealth grew by 50 percent while southern wealth dropped 60 percent. Along the path that General William Tecumseh Sherman’s Union army had blazed across Georgia and the Carolinas, one observer reported in 1866, the countryside “looked for many miles like a broad black streak of ruin and desolation.” ­Burned-​­out Columbia, South Carolina, said another witness, was “a wilderness of ruins”; Charleston, the birthplace of secession, had become a place of “vacant houses, of widowed women, of rotting wharves, of deserted warehouses, of ­weed-​­wild gardens, of miles of ­grass-​­grown streets, of acres of pitiful and voiceless barrenness.” Throughout the South, property values had collapsed. In the year after the war ended, ­eighty-​­one plantations in Mississippi were sold for less than a tenth of what they had been worth in 1860. Confederate government bonds and

 Richmond after the Civil War Before evacuating the capital of the Confederacy, Richmond, Virginia, Rebels set fire to warehouses and factories to prevent their falling into Union hands. Pictured here is one of Richmond’s burnt districts in April 1865. Women in mourning attire walk among the shambles.

 704  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 paper money were worthless; personal savings had vanished. Amanda Worthington, a planter’s wife from Mississippi, saw her whole world destroyed. In the fall of 1865, she assessed the damage: “None of us can realize that we are no longer w ­ ealthy—​­yet thanks to the Yankees, the cause of all unhappiness, such is the case.” Union soldiers who fanned out across the defeated South to impose order were cursed and spat upon. A Virginia woman expressed a spirited defiance common among her circle of Confederate friends: “Every day, every hour, that I live increases my hatred and detestation, and loathing of that race. They [Yankees] disgrace our common humanity. As a people I consider them vastly inferior to the better classes of our slaves.” Fervent southern nationalists, both men and women, implanted in their children a similar hatred of Yankees and a defiance of northern rule. One mother said that she trained her children to “fear God, love the South, and live to avenge her.” Many of the largest southern ­cities—​­Richmond, Atlanta, ­Charleston—​ ­were in ruins; most southern railroads were damaged or destroyed. Cotton that had not been destroyed by invading Union armies was now seized by federal troops. Emancipation had eliminated $4 billion invested in slaves and left the agricultural economy in confusion. It would take decades before farm production regained its p ­ re-​­war levels. In 1860, just before the war began, the South generated 30 percent of the nation’s wealth; in 1870, only ten years later, it produced but 12 percent. Many southerners were homeless and hungry, emotionally exhausted and physically disabled. Lives had been ­shattered—​­literally. Countless families had lost sons and husbands, and many surviving war veterans returned home with one or more limbs missing. In 1866, the state of Mississippi spent a fifth of its annual budget on artificial limbs for Confederate soldiers. Confederate general Braxton Bragg returned to his “once prosperous” Alabama home to find “all, all was lost, except my debts.” Rebuilding the former Confederacy would not be easy, and the issues related to reconstruction were often complicated and controversial. For example, the process of forming new state governments required first determining the official status of the states that had seceded: Were they now conquered ­territories? If so, then the Constitution assigned Congress authority to r­e-​ ­create their state governments. But what if, as Abraham Lincoln had argued, the Confederate states had never officially left the Union because the act of secession was itself illegal? In that circumstance, the president would be responsible for ­re-​­forming state governments. Whichever branch of ­government—​­Congress or the ­presidency—​­directed the reconstruction of the South, it would have to address the most difficult

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  705

 issue: What would be the political, social, and economic status of the freed slaves? Were they citizens? If not, what was their status as Americans? What the freed slaves wanted most was to become s­ elf-​­reliant as soon as possible. That meant being able to control their labor, reunite with their family members, gain education for their children, enjoy full participation in political life, and create their own community organizations and social life. Many whites were just as determined to prevent that from happening.

 Debates over Political ­R econstruction The reconstruction of former Confederate states actually began during the war and went through several phases, the first of which was Presidential Reconstruction. In 1862, with Union forces advancing into the South, President Lincoln had named army generals to serve as temporary military governors for conquered Confederate areas. By the end of 1863, he had formulated a plan to reestablish governments in states liberated from Confederate rule.

 lincoln’s plan

 In late 1863, President Lincoln issued a Proclamation of Amnesty and Reconstruction, under which any Confederate state could recreate a Union government once a number equal to 10 percent of those who had voted in 1860 swore allegiance to the Constitution. They also received a presidential pardon acquitting them of treason. Certain groups, however, were denied pardons: Confederate government officials; senior officers of the Confederate army and navy; judges, congressmen, and military officers of the United States who had left their posts to aid the rebellion; and those who had abused captured African American soldiers.

 congressional plans

 A few conservative and most moderate Republicans supported Lincoln’s program that immediately restored ­pro-​ ­Union southern governments. However, the Radical Republicans argued that Congress, not the president, should supervise Reconstruction. The Radical Republicans favored a drastic transformation of southern society that would grant e­ x-​­slaves full citizenship rights. Many Radicals, motivated primarily by religious values and moral ideals, believed that all people, regardless of race, were equal in God’s eyes. They wanted no compromise with the “sin” of racism. The Radicals also hoped to replace the white, Democratic planter elite with a new generation of small farmers, along with ­wage-​­earning and ­middle-​­class

 706  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 Republicans. “The middling classes who own the soil, and work it with their own hands,” explained Radical leader Thaddeus Stevens, “are the main support of every free government.”

 the ­wade-​­davis bill

 In 1864, with the war still raging, the Radical Republicans tried to take charge of Reconstruction by passing the W ­ ade-​­Davis Bill, sponsored by Senator Benjamin Franklin Wade of Ohio and Representative Henry Winter Davis of Maryland. Unlike Lincoln’s 10-percent plan, the ­Wade-​­Davis Bill required that a majority of white males swear their allegiance to the Union before a Confederate state could be readmitted. But the ­Wade-​­Davis Bill never became law: Lincoln vetoed it as being too harsh. In retaliation, Republicans issued the ­Wade-​­Davis Manifesto, which accused Lincoln of exceeding his constitutional authority. Unfazed, Lincoln moved ahead with his efforts to restore the Confederate states to the Union. He also acted boldly to provide assistance to the freed slaves in the South.

 the freedmen’s bureau

 In early 1865, Congress approved the Thirteenth Amendment to the Constitution, officially abolishing slavery in the United States. The amendment, and the war that enabled it, liberated 4 million slaves. Yet what did freedom mean for the former slaves, most of whom had no land, no home, no food, no jobs, and no education? Throughout the major northern cities, people had formed Freedmen’s Aid Societies to raise funds and recruit volunteers to help the African Americans in the South. Many churches did the same. But the needs far exceeded such grassroots efforts. It soon fell to the federal government to address the desperate plight of the former slaves. On March 3, 1865, Congress created the Freedmen’s Bureau (within the War Department) to assist the “freedmen and their wives and children.” It was the first federal experiment in providing assistance directly to people rather than to states. In May 1865, General Oliver O. Howard, commissioner of the Freedmen’s Bureau, declared that freed slaves “must be free to choose their own employers, and be paid for their labor.” He sent agents to the South to negotiate labor contracts between blacks and white landowners, many of whom resisted. The Bureau also provided the former slaves with medical care and food and clothing, and also helped set up schools. By 1870, the Bureau was supervising nearly 4,000 new schools serving almost 250,000 students, many of whose teachers were initially women volunteers from the North. The Freedmen’s Bureau also helped former slaves reconnect with family members. Marriages that had been prohibited during slavery were now made legal.

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  707

 Freedmen’s school in Virginia Throughout the former Confederate states, the Freedmen’s Bureau set up schools for former slaves, such as this one.

 freed slaves and land

 A few northerners argued that what the ­ex-​­slaves needed most was their own land. A New Englander traveling in the postwar South noted that the “sole ambition of the freedman” was “. . . to become the owner of a little piece of land, there to erect a humble home, and to dwell in peace and security at his own free will and pleasure.” In coastal South Carolina and in Mississippi, former slaves had been “given” land by Union armies that had taken control of Confederate areas during the war. Even northern abolitionists balked at Radical proposals to confiscate ­white-​ ­owned land and distribute it to the freed slaves, however. Citizenship and legal rights were one thing, wholesale confiscation of property and land redistribution quite another. Nonetheless, the discussions fueled false rumors that freed slaves everywhere would get “forty acres and a mule,” a slogan that swept across the South. Ulysses S. Grant, still ­general-​­in-​­chief of the U.S. Army, reported that the mistaken belief among the freed slaves that they would receive their own farmland was “seriously interfering” with their willingness to sign labor contracts agreeing to work as farmhands for pay. In July 1865, hundreds of freed slaves gathered near an old church on St. Helena Island off the South Carolina coast. There, V ­ irginia-​­born freeman

 708  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 Martin Delaney, the ­highest-​­ranking officer in the U.S. Colored Troops, addressed them. Before the Civil War, he had been a prominent abolitionist in the North. Now, Major Delaney assured the gathering that slavery had indeed been “absolutely abolished.” But abolition, he stressed, was less the result of Abraham Lincoln’s leadership than it was the outcome of former slaves and free blacks like him deciding to resist and undermine the Confederacy. Slavery was dead, and freedom was now in their hands. “Yes, yes, yes,” his listeners shouted. Major Martin Delaney Delaney urged Delaney then noted that many of former slaves to achieve economic s ­ elf-​ ­sufficiency by accepting paying jobs the white planters in the area claimed from whites. that the former slaves were lazy and “have not the intelligence to get on for yourselves without being guided and driven to the work by [white] overseers.” Delaney dismissed such assumptions as lies intended to restore a system of forced labor for blacks. He then told the freed slaves that their best hope was to become s­ elf-​­sustaining farmers: “Get a community and get all the lands you ­can—​­if you cannot get any singly.” Then “grow as much vegetables etc., as you want for your families; on the other part of land, you cultivate rice and cotton.” They must find ways to become economically ­self-​­reliant, he stressed. Otherwise, they would find themselves slaves again. Several white planters attended Delaney’s talk, and an army officer at the scene reported that they “listened with horror depicted in their faces” when De­laney urged the former slaves to become independent farmers. The planters predicted that such speeches would incite “open rebellion” among southern blacks.

 wage slavery

 The intensity of racial prejudice in the South often thwarted the efforts of Freedmen’s Bureau ­agents—​­as well as federal ­troops—​ ­to protect and assist the former slaves. In late June 1865, for example, a white planter in the Lowcountry of South Carolina, near Charleston, signed a contract with s­ ixty-​­five of his former slaves calling for them to “attend & cultivate” his fields “according to the usual system of planting rice & provision lands, and to conform to all reasonable rules & regulations as may be prescribed” by the

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  709

 white owner. In exchange, the workers would receive “half of the crop raised after having deducted the seed of rice, corn, peas & potatoes.” Any workers who violated the terms of the contract could be evicted from the plantation, leaving them jobless and homeless. A federal army officer who witnessed the contract reported that he expected “more trouble on this place than any other on the river.” Another officer objected to the contract’s provision that the owner could require workers to cut wood or dig ditches without compensation. But most worrisome was that the contract essentially enslaved the workers because no matter “how much they are abused, they cannot leave without permission of the owner.” If they chose to leave, they would forfeit any right to a portion of the crop. Across the former Confederacy, it was evident that the former white economic elite was determined to continue to control and constrain African Americans.

 death of a president

 The possibility of a lenient federal reconstruction of the Confederacy would die with Abraham Lincoln. The president offered his last view of Reconstruction in the final speech of his life. On April 11, 1865, he rejected calls by Radicals for a vengeful peace. He wanted “no persecution, no bloody work,” no hangings of Confederate leaders, and no extreme efforts to restructure southern social and economic life. Three days later, on April 14, Abraham Lincoln and his wife Mary went to see a play at Ford’s Theatre in Washington, D.C. With his trusted bodyguard called away to Richmond, Lincoln was defenseless as John Wilkes Booth, a popular actor and a rabid Confederate, slipped into the unguarded presidential box and shot the president in the head. Lincoln, Booth claimed, was the cause of all the nation’s “troubles,” and God had directed him to kill the president. As the mortally wounded Lincoln slumped forward, Booth stabbed a military aide and jumped from the box to the stage, breaking his leg in the process. Booth limped out a stage door, mounted a waiting horse, and fled the city. Lincoln died nine hours later. At the same time that Booth was shooting the president, other Confederate assassins were hunting Vice President Andrew Johnson and Secretary of State William H. Seward. Johnson escaped injury because his w ­ ould-​­be assassin got drunk in the bar of the vice president’s hotel. Seward and four others, including his son, however, suffered severe knife wounds when attacked at home. The nation extracted a full measure of vengeance from the conspirators. After a desperate ­eleven-​­day manhunt, soldiers and deputies pursued Booth into Virginia. He was starving and “despairing,” he wrote in his diary, nursing a broken leg while being “hunted like a dog.” Booth’s pursuers finally found

 710  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 and killed him at sunrise in a burning barn. Three of his collaborators were convicted by a military court and hanged, as was Mary Surratt, who owned the Washington boardinghouse where the assassinations had been planned. Some people celebrated Lincoln’s death. “They’ve shot Abe Lincoln,” a Massachusetts Democrat shouted. “He’s dead and I’m glad he’s dead.” A Republican congressman from Indiana reported that the president’s “death is a ­god-​­send” to the Radicals. Most felt otherwise, however. The outpouring of grief after Lincoln’s death was overwhelming. Planned events celebrating victory were canceled. Even a Richmond, Virginia, newspaper called the assassination the “heaviest blow which has fallen on the people of the South.” Confederate president Jefferson Davis, fleeing Federal troops, learned about Lincoln’s murder in Charlotte, North Carolina. He too worried that the assassination would be “disastrous for our people.” General Ulysses S. Grant observed that the fallen president “was incontestably the greatest man I ever knew.” Lincoln’s body lay in state for several days in Washington, D.C., before being transported 1,600 miles by train on April 21 for burial in Springfield, Illinois. In Philadelphia, 300,000 mourners paid their last respects; in New York City, 500,000 people viewed Lincoln’s body. On May 4, Lincoln was laid to rest for eternity.

 johnson’s

 Paying respect The only photograph of Lincoln in his coffin, displayed here in New York’s City Hall rotunda.

 plan

 Lincoln’s shocking death propelled into the White House Andrew Johnson of Tennessee, a ­ pro-​­ Union Democrat who was the only senator from a seceding state to remain in Washington. He had been added to Lincoln’s National Union ticket in 1864 solely to help the president win reelection. Humorless and insecure, combative and obstinate, Johnson nursed fierce prejudices (he hated both the white southern elite and the idea of racial equality). He also had a weakness for liquor. At the inaugural ceremonies in early 1865, he had delivered his v­ ice-​­presidential address in a state of slurring drunkenness. Like Lincoln and his hero Andrew Jackson, Johnson was a ­self-​­made man.

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  711

 Born in poverty in Raleigh, North Carolina, he never attended school. At age thirteen he relocated to Greeneville, in the mountains of east Tennessee, where he was apprenticed to a tailor who helped him learn to read. Eventually, as the ­self-​­proclaimed friend of the “common man,” he served as the mayor, a state legislator, governor, congressional representative, and U.S. senator. Johnson’s supporters were primarily small farmers and the working poor. He called himself a Jacksonian Democrat “in the strictest meaning of the term. I am for putting down the [Confederate] rebellion, because it is a war [of wealthy plantation owners] against democracy.” He had long disliked the planter elite, whom he damned as “a pampered, bloated, corrupted aristocracy.” Johnson, however, hated African Americans, too. He shared the racist attitudes of most southern whites, rich and poor. “Damn the negroes,” he exclaimed to a friend during the war. “I am fighting those traitorous aristocrats, their masters.” Johnson maintained that “white men alone must manage the South.” As a states’ rights Democrat, he also strongly opposed Republican economic policies designed to spur industrial development. And he also insisted that the federal government should be as small and inactive as possible. With Congress in recess, Johnson was temporarily in control of what he called the “restoration” of the Union. He needed to put his plan in place over the next seven months before the new Congress convened and the Radical Republicans would take charge. In May 1865, Johnson issued a new Proclamation of Amnesty that excluded not only those e­ x-​­Confederates whom Lincoln had barred from a presidential pardon but also anyone with property worth more than $20,000. Johnson also wanted to prosecute Robert E. Lee and other ­high-​­ranking Confederate officers for treason. He finally backed down when Ulysses S. Grant threatened to resign if the president persisted in his efforts to put Lee and others on trial. Johnson was determined to keep the wealthiest southerners from regain­ ing political power. Surprisingly, however, he eventually pardoned most Andrew Johnson A ­pro-​­Union of the white “aristocrats” he claimed Democrat from Tennessee. to despise. What brought about this

 712  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 change of heart? Johnson had decided that he could buy the political support of prominent southerners by pardoning them, improving his chances of reelection. Johnson’s Restoration Plan included the appointment of a Unionist as provisional governor in each southern state, a position with the authority to call a convention of men elected by “loyal” (that is, not Confederate) voters. His plan required that each state convention ratify the Thirteenth Amendment ending slavery before the state could be readmitted to the Union. Johnson also encouraged the conventions to give a few blacks voting rights, especially those with some education or with military service, so as to “disarm” the Republican “radicals who are wild upon” giving all African Americans the right to vote. Except for Mississippi, each state of the former Confederacy held a convention that met Johnson’s requirements but ignored his suggestion about voting rights for blacks.

 the radicals rebel

 Johnson’s initial assault on the southern planter elite won him the support of the Radical Republicans, but not for long. Many Radicals who wanted “Reconstruction” to provide social and political equality for blacks were infuriated by Johnson’s efforts to bring the South back into the Union as quickly as possible. The ­iron-​­willed Thaddeus Stevens viewed the Confederate states as “conquered provinces” to be readmitted to the Union by the U.S. Congress, not the president. President Johnson, however, balked at such an expansion of federal authority. He was committed to the states’ rights to control their affairs. “White men alone must manage the South,” Johnson told a visitor. By the end of 1865, the Radical Republicans had gained a majority in Congress and were warring with Andrew Johnson over the control of Reconstruction. On December 4, 1865, the president announced that the South had been restored to the Union. The final step in reconstruction, he added, would be for Congress to admit the newly elected southern representatives to the House and Senate. Republicans, however, were not about to welcome back former Confederate leaders who had been elected to Congress. Georgia, for example, had elected Alexander Stephens, former vice president of the Confederacy. Across the South, four Confederate generals, eight colonels, six Confederate cabinet members, and several Confederate legislators were also elected to Congress. Outraged Republicans denied seats to all such “Rebel” officials and appointed a congressional committee to develop a new plan to “reconstruct” the South.

 johnson versus the radicals

 President Johnson started a war with Congress over reconstruction when he vetoed a bill that renewed

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  713

 funding for the Freedmen’s Bureau and allowed the federal agency to begin providing homesteads and schools to former slaves in the South as well as the border states. Thaddeus Stevens and other Radicals realized that Johnson and the Democrats were trying to redefine the Civil War as a conflict between states’ rights and federal power, not a struggle over slavery. In ­mid-​­March 1866, the ­Radical-​­led Congress passed the pathbreaking Civil Rights Act, which announced that “all persons born in the United States” (except Indians) were citizens entitled to “full and equal benefit of all laws.” The new legislation enraged Johnson. Congress, he fumed, had no authority to grant citizenship to lazy former slaves who did not deserve it, and he argued that the Civil Rights Act discriminated against the “white race.” So he vetoed both bills. Now it was the Republicans’ turn to be infuriated. In April 1866, Congress overrode Johnson’s vetoes. From that point on, Johnson, a stubborn, uncompromising loner, steadily lost both public and political support. Soon thereafter, in the spring and summer of 1866, rampaging white vig­ ilantes and policemen in the South, many of them former Confederate soldiers, murdered and wounded hundreds of African Americans during riots in Memphis and New Orleans. “We are going to shoot down all these ­God-​­damned niggers,” a white policeman threatened. A Memphis newspaper glorified the killing of African Americans: “The negroes now know, to their sorrow, that it is best not to arouse the fury of the white man.” Northerners were incensed. The massacres, Radical Republicans argued, resulted from Andrew Johnson’s lenient policy toward white supremacists. “Witness Memphis, witness New Orleans,” “(?) Slavery Is Dead (?)” (1867) Thomas Nast’s cartoon argues that Massachusetts senator Charles Sumner southern blacks were still being treated cried. “Who can doubt that the Presi- as slaves despite the passage of the dent is the author of these tragedies?” Fourteenth Amendment. This detail The mob attacks helped motivate Con- illustrates a case in Raleigh, North gress to pass the Fourteenth Amend- Carolina: a black man was whipped for a crime despite federal orders specifically ment that year, extending federal civil prohibiting such forms of punishment. rights protections to blacks.

 714  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 black codes

 The violence directed against southern blacks was partly triggered by African American protests over restrictive laws being passed by the new ­all-​­white southern state legislatures in 1865 and 1866. These “black codes,” as a white southerner explained, were intended to make sure “the ­ex-​ ­slave was not a free man; he was a free Negro.” A northerner visiting the South said the black codes in each state were designed to enforce a widespread insistence that “the blacks at large belong to the whites at large.” The black codes differed from state to state, but their shared purpose was clear: to restore white supremacy. While black marriages were recognized for the first time, African Americans could not vote, serve on juries or in the militia, testify against whites, or attend public schools. They could not own farmland in Mississippi or city property in South Carolina. In Alabama, they could not own guns. In Mississippi, every black male over the age of eighteen had to be apprenticed to a white, preferably a former slave owner. The Texas black code prohibited blacks from marrying whites and from holding elected office. Virtually all of the state black codes required that adult freed slaves sign annual labor contracts. Otherwise, they would be jailed as “vagrants.” If they could not pay the vagrancy fi ­ ne—​­and most of them could n ­ ot—​ ­they were forced to work for whites as convict laborers in “chain gangs.” In part, states employed this “convict lease” system as a means of increasing government revenue and cutting the expenses of holding prisoners. But convict leasing at its worst was one of the most exploitative labor systems in history, as people convicted of crimes, mostly African Americans who were often falsely accused, were hired out by county and state governments to work for individuals and ­businesses—​­coal mines, lumber camps, brickyards, railroads, quarries, mills, and plantations. Convict leasing was a thinly disguised form of ­neo-​­slavery. The black codes angered Republicans. “We [Republicans] must see to it,” Senator William Stewart of Nevada resolved, “that the man made free by the Constitution of the United States is a freeman indeed.” And that is what they set out to do. A former slave who had served in the Union army shared the disbelief felt by most African Americans at the black codes: “If you call this Freedom, what do you call Slavery?”

 fourteenth amendment

 To ensure the legality of the new federal Civil Rights Act, the Congressional Joint Committee on Reconstruction proposed in April 1866 a pathbreaking Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution. It guaranteed citizenship to anyone born or naturalized in the United States, except Native Americans. It also prohibited any efforts

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  715

 to violate the civil rights of “citizens,” black or white; to deprive any person “of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law”; or to “deny any person . . . the equal protection of the laws.” With the Fourteenth Amendment, Congress gave the federal government responsibility for protecting (and enforcing) the civil rights of virtually all Americans. The amendment was approved by Congress on June 16, 1866. Not a single Democrat in the House or the Senate voted for it. All states in the former Confederacy were required to ratify the amendment before they could be readmitted to the Union and to Congress. Again, President Johnson seethed. “This is a country for white men,” he insisted, “and, by God, as long as I am President, it shall be a government by white men.” Johnson urged the southern states to refuse to ratify the amendment. He predicted that the Democrats would win the congressional elections in November and then nix the new amendment. But Johnson was steadily losing support in the North. New York newspaper editor Horace Greeley called Johnson “an aching tooth in the national jaw, a screeching infant in a crowded lecture room.”

 johnson versus radicals

 To win votes for Democratic candidates, Johnson went on a speaking tour of the Midwest during which he denounced Radical Republicans as traitors who should be hanged. Several of his speeches backfired, however. In Cleveland, Ohio, Johnson exchanged ­hot-​­tempered insults with a heckler. At another stop, while the president was speaking from the back of a railway car, the engineer mistakenly pulled the train out of the station, making the president appear quite the fool. Republicans charged that such unseemly incidents confirmed Johnson’s image as a “ludicrous boor” and a “drunken imbecile.” In the end, the 1866 congressional elections were a devastating defeat for Johnson and the Democrats; in each house, Radical Republican candidates won more than a ­two-​­thirds majority, the margin required to override presidential vetoes. Congressional Republicans would now take over from the president the process of reconstructing the former Confederacy.

 congress takes charge On March 2, 1867, the new Congress passed, over Johnson’s vetoes, three crucial new laws creating what came to be called Congressional Reconstruction: the Military Reconstruction Act, the Command of the Army Act, and the Tenure of Office Act. The Military Reconstruction Act was the capstone of the Congressional Reconstruction plan. It abolished all new governments “in the rebel States” established under President Johnson’s lenient reconstruction policies. In

 716  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 their place, Congress established military control over ten of the eleven former Confederate states. Tennessee was exempted because it had already ratified the Fourteenth Amendment. The other ten e­ x-​­Confederate states were divided into five military districts, each commanded by a general who acted as governor. The Military Reconstruction Act required each state to create a new constitution that guaranteed the right to vote for all adult ­males—​­black or white, rich or poor, landless or property owners. W ­ omen—​­black or ­white—​­did not yet have the vote and were not included in the discussions. The Military Reconstruction Act also stipulated that the new state constitutions in each of the former Confederate states were to be drafted by conventions elected by male citizens “of whatever race, color, or previous condition.” Each state constitution had to guarantee the right of African American males to vote. Once a constitution was ratified by a majority of voters and accepted by Congress, other criteria had to be met. The new state legislature had to ratify the Fourteenth Amendment, and once the amendment became part of the Constitution, any given state would be entitled to representation in Congress. Several hundred African American delegates participated in the statewide constitutional conventions. The Command of the Army Act required that the president issue all army orders through G ­ eneral-​­in-​­Chief Ulysses S. Grant. The Radical Republicans feared that President Johnson would appoint generals to head up the military districts who would be too lenient. So they bypassed the president and entrusted Grant to enforce Congressional Reconstruction in the South. The Tenure of Office Act required Senate permission for the president to remove any federal official whose appointment the Senate had confirmed. This act was intended to prevent Johnson from firing Secretary of War Edwin Stanton, the president’s most outspoken critic in the cabinet. Congressional Reconstruction embodied the most sweeping peacetime legislation in American history to that point. Its various measures sought to ensure that freed slaves could participate in the creation of new state governments in the former Confederacy. As Thaddeus Stevens explained, the Congressional Reconstruction plan was designed to create a “perfect republic” based on the principle of equal rights for all citizens. “This is the promise of America,” he insisted. “No More. No Less.”

 impeaching the president

 The first two years of Congressional Reconstruction produced dramatic changes in the South, as new state legislatures rewrote their constitutions and ratified the Fourteenth Amendment. Radical Republicans now seemed fully in control of Reconstruction, but one

 Debates over Political R ­ econstruction  717

 person still stood in their w ­ ay—​­Andrew Johnson. During 1867 and early 1868, more and more Radicals decided that the defiant Democratic president must be removed from office if their reconstruction program were to succeed. Johnson himself opened the door to impeachment (the formal process by which Congress charges the president with “high crimes and misdemeanors”) when, in violation of the Tenure of Office Act, he fired Secretary of War Edwin Stanton, who had refused to resign from the cabinet despite his harsh criticism of the president’s Reconstruction policy. Johnson, who considered the Tenure of Office Act an illegal restriction of presidential power, fired Stanton on August 12, 1867, and replaced him with Ulysses S. Grant. To the Republicans, this was a declaration of war. John F. Farnsworth, an Illinois congressman, denounced the president as an “ungrateful, despicable, besotted, traitorous man.” The Radicals now saw their chance. By removing Stanton without congressional approval, Johnson had violated the law. On February 24, 1868, the ­Republican-​­dominated House passed eleven articles of impeachment (that is, specific charges against the president), most of which dealt with Stanton’s

 Trial of Andrew Johnson In this Harper’s Weekly illustration, Johnson is seated at the center of the foreground among his defense committee. The galleries of the Senate are packed with men and women watching the trial.

 718  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 ­ ring, and all of which were flimsy. In reality, the essential grievance against fi the president was that he had opposed the policies of the Radical Republicans. According to Secretary of the Navy Gideon Welles, Radicals were so angry at Johnson that they “would have tried to remove him had he been accused of stepping on a dog’s tail.” The first Senate trial of a sitting president began on March 5, 1868, with Chief Justice Salmon P. Chase presiding. It was a dramatic spectacle before a packed gallery of journalists, foreign dignitaries, corporate executives, and political officials. As the trial began, Thaddeus Stevens, the Radical leader, warned the president: “Unfortunate, unhappy man, behold your doom!” The ­five-​­week trial ended in stunning fashion, but not as the Radicals had hoped. The Senate voted 35 to 19 for conviction, only one vote short of the ­two-​­thirds needed for removal from office. Senator Edmund G. Ross, a young Radical from Kansas, cast the deciding vote in favor of acquittal, knowing that his vote would ruin his political career. “I almost literally looked down into my open grave,” Ross explained afterward. “Friendships, position, fortune, everything that makes life desirable . . . were about to be swept away by the breath of my mouth.” Ross was thereafter shunned by the Republicans. He lost his reelection campaign and died in near poverty. The effort to remove Johnson was in the end a grave political mistake, for it weakened public support for Congressional Reconstruction. Nevertheless, the Radical cause did gain something: to avoid being convicted, Johnson had privately agreed to stop obstructing Congressional Reconstruction.

 republican rule in the south

 In June 1868, congressional Republicans announced that eight southern states were allowed again to send delegates to Congress. The remaining former Confederate ­states—​­Virginia, Mississippi, and T ­ exas—​­were readmitted in 1870, with the added requirement that they ratify the Fifteenth Amendment, which gave voting rights to African American men. As black leader Frederick Douglass, himself a former slave, had declared in 1865, “slavery is not abolished until the black man has the ballot.” The Fifteenth Amendment prohibited states from denying any man the vote on grounds of “race, color, or previous condition of servitude.” But Susan B. Anthony and Elizabeth Cady Stanton, seasoned leaders of the movement to secure an “honorable independence” and voting rights for women, demanded that the amendment be revised to include women. As Anthony stressed in a famous speech, the U.S. Constitution said: “We, the people; not we, the white male citizens; nor yet we, the male citizens; but we, the whole

 Blacks under Reconstruction  719

 people, who formed the ­Union—​­women as well as men.” Most men, however, remained unreconstructed when it came to voting rights for women. Radical Republicans tried to deflect the issue by declaring that it was the “Negro’s hour.” Women would have to ­wait—​­another fifty years, as it turned out.

 Blacks under Reconstruction When a federal official asked Garrison Frazier, a former slave in Georgia, if he and others wanted to live among whites, he said that they preferred “to live by ourselves, for there is a prejudice against us in the South that will take years to get over.” In forging new lives, Frazier and many other former slaves set about creating their own social institutions.

 freed but not equal

 African Americans in the postwar South were active agents in affecting the course of Reconstruction. It was not an easy process, however, because whites, both northern and southern, still practiced racism. A northern journalist traveling in the South after the war reported that the “whites seem wholly unable to comprehend that freedom for the negro means the same thing as freedom for them.” Once the excitement of freedom wore off, most southern blacks realized that their best chance to make a living was by doing farmwork for their former owners. In fact, the Freedmen’s Bureau and the federal soldiers urged and even ordered them to sign labor contracts with local whites. Many planters, however, conspired to control the wages paid to freedmen. “It seems humiliating to be compelled to bargain and haggle with our own servants about wages,” complained a white planter’s daughter. White southerners also used terror, intimidation, and violence to suppress black efforts to gain social and economic equality. In many respects, the war had not ended, as armed men organized to thwart federal efforts to ­reconstruct the South. In July 1866, a black woman in Clinch County, Georgia, was arrested and given ­sixty-​­five lashes for “using abusive language” during an encounter with a white woman. The Civil War had brought freedom to enslaved African Americans, but it did not bring them protection against exploitation or abuse. After emancipation, Union soldiers and northern observers in the South often commented that freed slaves did not go far away from where they had been enslaved. But why would they leave what they knew so well? As a group of African Americans explained, they did not want to abandon “land

 720  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 they had laid their fathers’ bones upon.” A Union officer noted that southern blacks seemed “more attached to familiar places” than any other group in the nation. Participation in the Union army or navy had provided many freedmen with training in leadership. Black military veterans would form the core of the first generation of African American political leaders in the postwar South. Military service gave many former slaves their first opportunities to learn to read and write, and army life also alerted them to new opportunities for economic advancement, social respectability, and civic leadership. Fighting for the Union cause also instilled a fervent sense of nationalism. A Virginia freedman explained that the United States was “now our c­ ountry—​­made emphatically so by the blood of our brethren.”

 black churches and schools

 African American religious life in the South was transformed during and after the war. Many former slaves identified with the biblical Hebrews, who were led out of slavery into the “promised land.” Emancipation demonstrated that God was on their side. Before the war, slaves who were allowed to attend white churches were forced to sit in the back. After the war, with the help of many northern Christian

 The First African Church On the eve of its move to a new building, the First African Church of Richmond, Virginia, was featured in a short article, including illustrations such as this one, in Harper’s Weekly, in June 1874.

 Blacks under Reconstruction  721

 missionaries, both black and white, e­ x-​­slaves eagerly established their own African American churches. The black churches were the first social institution the former slaves could control and quickly became the crossroads for black community life. Black ministers emerged as social and political leaders as well as preachers. One could not be a real minister, one of them claimed, without looking “out for the political interests of his people.” Many African Americans became Baptists or Methodists, in part because these were already the largest denominations in the South, and in part because they reached out to the working poor. In 1866 alone, the African Methodist Episcopal (AME) Church gained 50,000 members. By 1890, more than 1.3 million African Americans in the South had become Baptists, nearly three times as many as had joined any other denomination. African American communities also rushed to establish schools. Education, said a freed slave in Mississippi, was “the next best thing to liberty.” Starting schools, said another former slave, was the “first proof ” of freedom. Most plantation owners had denied education to blacks in part because they feared that literate slaves would read abolitionist literature and organize uprisings. After the war, the white elite worried that formal education would distract poor whites and blacks from their work in the fields or encourage them to leave the South in search of better social and economic opportunities. “They didn’t want us to learn nothin’, ” claimed one former slave. White opposition made education all the more important to African Americans. South Carolina’s Mary McLeod Bethune rejoiced in the opportunity: “The whole world opened to me when I learned to read.” She walked five miles to school as a child, then earned a scholarship to college, and went on to become the first black woman to found a school that became a ­four-​­year college: what is today known as B ­ ethune-​­Cookman University, in Daytona Beach, Florida.

 politics and african americans

Participation in the
 Union army or navy had given many former slaves their first opportunity to express their loyalty to the American nation. A Virginia freedman explained that the United States was “now our country,” paid for “by the blood of our brethren” who died while serving in the Union military during the Civil War. Serving in the military enabled many former slaves to learn to read and ­write—​ ­and develop leadership qualities suitable for political roles after the war. Groups encouraging freed slaves to embrace the Republican party were organized throughout the South. They were chiefly sponsored by the Union League, founded in Philadelphia in 1862. League recruiters in the South

 722  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 enrolled African Americans and loyal whites, initiated them into the secrets and rituals of the order, and instructed them “in their rights and duties.” The Union League was so successful in its recruiting efforts among African Americans that in 1867, it had e­ ighty-​­eight chapters in South Carolina alone. The League claimed to have enrolled almost every adult black male in the state. Of course, any African American participation in southern political life was a first. Some 600 ­blacks—​­most of them former s­ laves—​­served as state legislators under Congressional Reconstruction. In Louisiana, Pinckney Pinchback, a northern free black and former Union soldier, was elected lieutenant governor. Several other African Americans were elected lieutenant governor, state treasurer, or secretary of state. There were two black senators in Congress, Hiram Revels and Blanche K. Bruce, both Mississippi natives who had been educated in the North, as well as fourteen black members of the U.S. House of Representatives. White southerners were appalled at the election of black politicians. Democrat extremists claimed that Radicals were trying to “organize a hell in the South” by putting “the Caucasian race” under the rule of “their own negroes.” Southern whites complained that freed slaves were illiterate and had no civic

 African American political figures of Reconstruction Blanche K. Bruce (left) and Hiram Revels (right) served in the U.S. Senate. Frederick Douglass (center) was a major figure in the abolitionist movement.

 Blacks under Reconstruction  723

 experience or appreciation of political issues and processes. In this regard, blacks were no different from millions of poor or immigrant white males who had been allowed to vote in many jurisdictions for years. Some freedmen frankly confessed their disadvantages. Beverly Nash, an African American delegate to the South Carolina convention of 1868, told his colleagues: “I believe, my friends and ­fellow-​­citizens, we are not prepared for this suffrage [the vote]. But we can learn. Give a man tools and let him commence to use them, and in time he will learn a trade. So it is with voting.”

 land, labor, and disappointment

 A few northerners argued that what the former slaves needed most was their own land, where they could gain economic ­self-​­sufficiency. “What is freedom,” Ohio congressman James A. Garfield, a former general and future president, asked in 1865. “Is it the bare privilege of not being chained? If this is all, then freedom is a bitter mockery, a cruel delusion.” Freed slaves felt the same way. Freedom, explained a black minister from Georgia, meant the freedom for blacks to “reap the fruit of our own labor, and take care of ourselves.” In several southern states, former slaves had been “given” land by Union armies after they had taken control of Confederate areas during the war. But

 Freedmen voting in New Orleans The Fifteenth Amendment, ratified in 1870, guaranteed at the federal level the right of citizens to vote regardless of “race, color, or previous condition of servitude.” But former slaves had been registering to v­ ote—​­and voting in large ­numbers—​­in some state elections since 1867, as in this scene.

 724  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 transfers of ­white-​­owned property to former slaves were reversed during 1865 by President Andrew Johnson. In South Carolina, the Union general responsible for evicting former slaves urged them to “lay aside their bitter feelings, and become reconciled to their old masters.” But the assembled freedmen shouted “No, never!” and “Can’t do it!” They knew that ownership of land was the foundation of their freedom. Yes, they had no deeds or titles for the land they now worked, but it had been “earned by the sweat of our brows,” said a group of Alabama freedmen. President Johnson, however, insisted that the federal government had no right to take land from former Confederates. Tens of thousands of former slaves were forced to return their farms to the white owners. In addition, it was virtually impossible for former slaves to get loans to buy farmland because so few banks were willing to lend to blacks. Their sense of betrayal was profound. Reconstruction of the South would not include the redistribution of southern property. An ­ex-​­slave in Mississippi whose farm was returned to its white owner said the former slaves were left with nothing: “no land, no house, not so much as a place to lay our head.” Most former slaves were farm workers. After the war, their lack of cash and land led to the system of ­sharecropping—​­where the landowner provided land, seed, and tools to a poor farmer in exchange for a share of the c­ rop—which​ ­essentially ­re-​­enslaved the workers because, as a federal army officer objected, no matter “how much they are abused, they cannot leave without permission of the owner.” If they chose to leave, they would forfeit any right to a portion of the crop, and any workers who violated the terms of the contract could be evicted from the plantation, leaving them jobless and homeless. Across the former Confederacy, most white plantation owners and small farmers were determined to continue to control African Americans. Many freed blacks preferred sharecropping over working for wages, since it freed them from ­day-​­to-​­day supervision by white landowners. But over Sharecroppers A family is shown time, most sharecroppers, black and outside their Virginia home in this 1899 white, found themselves deep in debt photograph, taken by Frances Benjamin to the landowner, with little choice but Johnston, one of the earliest American to remain tied to the same discouragfemale photojournalists. ing system of dependence that, over

 Blacks under Reconstruction  725

 the years, felt much like slavery. As a former slave acknowledged, he and others had discovered that “freedom could make folks proud but it didn’t make ’em rich.”

 tensions among southern blacks

African Americans in
 the postwar South were by no means a uniform community. They had their own differences and disputes, especially between the few who owned property and the many who did not. In North Carolina, for example, less than 7 percent of blacks owned land by 1870, and most of them owned only a few acres; half of black property owners had fewer than twenty acres. Affluent northern blacks and the southern free black elite, most of whom were city dwellers and mulattos (people of mixed parentage), often opposed efforts to redistribute land to the freedmen, and many insisted that political equality did not mean social equality. As an African American leader in Alabama stressed, “We do not ask that the ignorant and degraded shall be put on a social equality with the refined and intelligent.” In general, however, unity rather than dissension prevailed, and African Americans focused on common concerns such as full equality under the law. “All we ask,” said a black member of the state constitutional convention in Mississippi, “is justice, and to be treated like human beings.” With little or no training or political experience, many African Americans served in state governments with distinction. Nonetheless, the scornful label “black Reconstruction,” used by critics then and since, distorts African American political influence. Such criticism also overlooks the political clout of the large number of white Republicans, especially in the mountain areas of the Upper South, who also favored the Radical plan for Reconstruction. Only South Carolina’s Republican state convention had a black majority. Louisiana’s was evenly divided racially, and in only two other state conventions were more than 20 percent of the members black: Florida and Virginia. The Texas convention was only 10 percent black, and North Carolina’s was 11 ­percent—​­but that did not stop a white newspaper from calling it a group of “baboons, monkeys, mules . . . and other jackasses.”

 “carpetbaggers” and “scalawags”

 Most of the offices in the new southern state governments went to white Republicans, who were dismissed as “carpetbaggers” or “scalawags.” Carpetbaggers, critics argued, were scheming northerners who rushed South with all their belongings in cheap suitcases made of carpeting (“carpetbags”) to grab political power. Some northerners in the postwar South were indeed corrupt opportunists. However, most were Union military veterans drawn to the South by the

 726  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 desire to rebuild the region’s devastated economy. New Yorker George Spencer, for example, arrived in Alabama with the Union army during the war and decided to pursue his “chances of making a fortune” in selling cotton and building railroads. He eventually was elected to the U.S. Senate (and later found guilty of political corruption). Many other ­so-​­called carpetbaggers were ­well-​­educated, ­middle-​­class teachers, social workers, attorneys, physicians, editors, and ministers motivated by a genuine desire to help the Carpetbagger The cartoonist’s caption free blacks and poor whites improve to this critique of carpetbaggers reads: the quality of their lives. Union general “The bag in front of him, filled with Adelbert Ames, a native of Maine who others’ faults, he always sees. The one behind him, filled with his own faults, he won the Medal of Honor, stayed in the never sees.” South after the war because he felt a “sense of Mission with a large M” to help the former slaves develop healthy communities. He served as the military governor of Mississippi before being elected a Republican U.S. senator in 1870. From 1874 to 1876, Ames was Mississippi’s governor before resigning in the face of a resurgent white Democratic party. As Ames witnessed, the “war still exists in a very important phase here.” The scalawags, or white southern Republicans, were especially hated by southern Democrats, who considered them traitors. A Nashville newspaper editor called them the “merest trash.” Most scalawags had been Unionists opposed to secession. They were especially prominent in mountain counties as far south as Georgia and Alabama and especially in the hills of eastern Tennessee. Among the scalawags were several distinguished figures, including the former Confederate general James Longstreet, who decided after Appomattox that the Old South must change its ways. He became a successful cotton broker in New Orleans, joined the Republican party, and supported the Radical Reconstruction program. Other scalawags were former Whigs attracted by the Republican party’s activist economic program of industrial and commercial expansion. Another unlikely scalawag was Joseph E. Brown, the Confederate governor of Georgia, who urged southerners to support Republicans because they were the only source of economic investment in the devastated region. What the

 Blacks under Reconstruction  727

 diverse “scalawags” had in common was a willingness to work with Republicans to rebuild the southern economy.

 southern resistance and white “­ redemption”

 Most southern whites viewed secession not as a mistake but as a noble “lost cause.” They used all means ­possible—​­legal and ­illegal—​­to “redeem” their beloved South from northern control, Republican rule, and black assertiveness. An Alabama planter admitted that southern whites simply “can’t learn to treat the freedmen like human beings.” White southern ministers, for example, assured their congregations that God endorsed white supremacy. In an attempt to reunite the Protestant RECONSTRUCTION, 1865–1877 PA ILLINOIS

 WV

 KANSAS

 MISSOURI



 KENTUCKY

INDIAN TERRITORY

 TEXAS



 AR

 LA

 TN 1866 1869



 MS

NJ MD DE

 OHIO

 IN

 NC

 GA

 AL

 VA

 SC

 FL

ME XI CO
States with Reconstruction governments 
 1868 Date of readmission to the Union 1870 Date of reestablishment of conservative Democratic rule



 Military districts set up by the Reconstruction Act of 1867

 Means by which Slavery was Abolished Emancipation Proclamation, 1863 State action Thirteenth Amendment, 1865





200 Miles


200 Kilometers


 How did the Military Reconstruction Act reorganize governments in the South in the late 1860s and 1870s? WWN64 ■ What did the former Confederate states have to do to be readmitted to the Union? Figure M16_1 Why did “Conservative” white parties gradually regain control of the South from 1st ■proof the Republicans in the 1870s? ■

 728  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 denominations of the North and South, many northern religionists became “apostles of forgiveness” for their southern white brethren. Even abolitionists such as the Reverend Henry Ward Beecher, whose sister Harriet Beecher Stowe had written Uncle Tom’s Cabin (1857), called for southern ­whites—​­rather than federal officials or African Americans ­themselves—​­to govern the South after the war. The Civil War had brought freedom to enslaved African Americans, but it did not bring them protection against exploitation or abuse. The “black codes” created in 1865 and 1866 were the first of many continuing efforts to deny equality to African Americans. With each passing year, resistance to Congressional Reconstruction and Radical Republican (“Radical”) rule became more and more violent. Hundreds were killed and many more injured in systematic efforts to “keep blacks in their place.” In Texas a white farmer, D. B. Whitesides, told a former slave named Charles Brown that his newfound freedom would do him “damned little good . . . as I intend to shoot you”—and he did, shooting Brown in the chest as he tried to flee. Whitesides then rode his horse beside Brown and asked, “I got you, did I Brown?” “Yes,” a bleeding Brown replied. “You got me good.” Whitesides yelled that the wound would teach “niggers [like you] to put on airs because you are free.” Such ugly incidents revealed a harsh truth: the death of slavery did not mean the birth of true freedom for many African Americans. For a growing number of southern whites, resistance to Radical Reconstruction became more and more violent. Several secret terrorist groups, including the Ku Klux Klan, the Knights of the White Camelia, the White Line, and the White League, as well as local militia units, emerged to harass, intimidate, and even kill scalawags, carpetbaggers, and African Americans. The Ku Klux Klan (KKK) was “Worse Than Slavery” This Thomas formed in 1866 in Pulaski, Tennessee. Nast cartoon condemns the Ku Klux The name Ku Klux was derived from Klan for promoting conditions “worse the Greek word kuklos, meaning “cirthan slavery” for southern blacks after cle” or “band” and Klan came from the the Civil War. English word clan, or family. The Klan,

 Blacks under Reconstruction  729

 and other groups like it, began initially as a social club, with costumes and secret rituals. But its members, most of them former Confederate soldiers, soon began harassing blacks and white Republicans. Federal general Philip Sheridan called them “terrorists” intent on suppressing black political participation. Their motives were ­varied—​­anger over the Confederate defeat, resentment against federal soldiers occupying the South, complaints about having to pay black workers, and an almost paranoid fear that former slaves might seek violent revenge against whites. Klansmen rode about at night spreading rumors, issuing threats, and burning schools and churches. “We are going to kill all the Negroes,” a white supremacist declared during one massacre.

 the legacy of republican rule

 One by one, the Republican state governments were gradually overturned. Yet they left behind an important accomplishment: the new constitutions they created remained in effect for years, and later constitutions incorporated many of their most progressive features. Among the most significant innovations brought about by the Republican state governments were protecting black voting rights, restructuring legislatures to reflect shifting populations, and making more state offices elective to weaken the “good old boy” tradition of rewarding political supporters with state government jobs. In South Carolina, former Confederate leaders opposed the Republican state legislature not simply because of its black members but because poor whites were also enjoying political clout for the first time, thereby threatening the traditional power of wealthy white plantation owners and merchants. Given the hostile circumstances under which Republican state governments operated in the South, their achievements were remarkable. They constructed an extensive railroad network and established public, though racially segregated, school ­systems—​­schools funded by state governments and open to all children. Some 600,000 black pupils were enrolled in southern schools by 1877. The Radicals also gave more attention to the poor and to orphanages, asylums, and institutions for the deaf and blind of both races. Public roads, bridges, and buildings were repaired or rebuilt. African Americans achieved rights and opportunities that would repeatedly be violated in coming decades but would never completely be taken away, at least in principle: equality before the law and the rights to own property, attend schools, learn to read and write, enter professions, and carry on business. Yet several Republican state governments also engaged in corrupt practices. Bribes and kickbacks, whereby companies received government contracts in

 730  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 return for giving government officials cash or stock, were commonplace. In Louisiana, a ­twenty-​­six-​­year-​­old carpetbagger, Henry Clay Warmoth, a Union war veteran and an attorney, somehow turned an annual salary of $8,000 into a ­million-​­dollar fortune over four years as governor. (He was eventually impeached and removed from office.) “I don’t pretend to be honest,” he admitted. “I only pretend to be as honest as anybody in politics.” As was true in the North and the Midwest at the time, southern state governments awarded money to corporations, notably railroads, under conditions that invited shady dealings and outright corruption. In fact, some railroad officials received state funds but never built any railroads. Such corruption was not invented by the Radical Republican regimes, nor did it die with them. Governor Warmoth recognized as much: “Corruption is the fashion” in Louisiana, he explained.

The Grant Administration
 Andrew Johnson’s crippled presidency created an opportunity for Republicans to elect one of their own in 1868. Both parties wooed Ulysses S. Grant, the “Lion of Vicksburg” credited by most Americans with the Union victory in the Civil War. His ­falling-​­out with President Johnson, however, had pushed him toward the Republicans, who unanimously nominated him as their presidential candidate.

 the election of 1868

 The Republican party platform endorsed Congressional Reconstruction. More important, however, were the public expectations driving the candidacy of Ulysses S. Grant, whose campaign slogan was “Let us have peace.” Grant promised that, if elected, he would enforce the laws and promote prosperity for all. The Democrats charged that the Radical Republicans were subjecting the South “to military despotism and Negro supremacy.” They nominated Horatio Seymour, the wartime governor of New York and a passionate critic of Congressional Reconstruction. His running mate, Francis P. Blair Jr., a former Union general from Missouri who had served in Congress, appealed directly to white bigotry when he denounced Republicans for promoting equality for “a ­semi-​­barbarous race” of black men who sought to “subject the white women to their unbridled lust.” A Democrat later said that Blair’s “stupid and indefensible” remarks cost Seymour a close election. Grant swept the electoral college, 214 to 80, but his popular majority was only 307,000 out of almost 6 million votes. More

The Grant Administration  731


 than 500,000 African American voters, mostly in the South, accounted for Grant’s margin of victory. The efforts of Radical Republicans to ensure that voting rights for southern blacks had paid off. As Frederick Douglass, the revered black leader, explained, “the Republican party is the ship and all else is the sea” as far as black voters were concerned. Grant, the youngest president ever (­forty-​­six years old at the time of his inauguration), had proved himself a great military leader, but he was not a strong politician. He passively followed the lead of Congress and was often blind to the political forces and s­ elf-​­serving influence peddlers around him. Members of his own party would become his greatest disappointments and worst enemies. A failure as a store- “The ­Working-​­Man’s Banner” This keeper and farmer before the Civil War, campaign banner makes reference Grant was awestruck by men of wealth to the ­working-​­class origins of who lavished gifts on him. He also Ulysses S. Grant and his v­ ice-​ ­presidential candidate, Henry Wilson, showed poor judgment in his selection by depicting Grant as a tanner of hides of cabinet members, often favoring and Wilson as a shoemaker. friendship and loyalty over integrity and ability. During Grant’s two terms in office, his seven cabinet positions changed ­twenty-​­four times. Some of the men betrayed his trust and engaged in criminal behavior. His former comrade in arms, General William T. Sherman, said he felt sorry for Grant because so many supposedly “loyal” Republicans used the president for their own selfish gains. Carl Schurz, a Union war hero who became a Republican senator from Missouri, expressed frustration that Grant was misled by cunning advisers who “prostituted” his administration.

 scandals

 President Grant’s administration was quickly mired in scandal. In the summer of 1869, two unprincipled financial schemers, Jay Gould and the colorful James Fisk Jr. (known as “Diamond Jim”), both infamous for bribing politicians and judges, plotted with Abel Corbin, the president’s

 732  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 ­ rother-​­in-​­law, to corner the gold market. They intended to create a public b craze for gold by purchasing massive quantities of the precious metal to drive up its value. The only danger to the complicated scheme lay in the possibility that the federal Treasury would burst the bubble by selling large amounts of its gold supply, which would deflate the value of gold by putting more in circulation. When Grant was seen in public with Gould and Fisk, people assumed that he supported their scheme. As the false rumor spread in New York City’s financial district that the president endorsed the ­run-​­up in gold, its value soared. On September 24, 1869—soon to be remembered as “Black Friday”—the scheme to drive up the price of gold worked, at least at first. Starting at $150 an ounce, the bidding for gold started to rise, first to $160, then $165, leading more and more investors across the nation and around the world to join the stampede. Then, around noon, President Grant and his Treasury secretary realized what was happening and began selling huge amounts of government gold. Within fifteen minutes, the bubble created by Fisk and Gould burst, and the price of gold plummeted to $138. People who had bought gold in large amounts lost fortunes. Their agony, said a New Yorker, “made one feel as if the Battle of Gettysburg had been lost and the Rebels were marching down Broadway.” Soon, the turmoil spread to the entire stock market, claiming thousands of victims. As Fisk noted, “It was each man drag out his own corpse.” For weeks after the gold bubble collapsed, financial markets were paralyzed and business confidence was shaken. Congressman James Garfield wrote privately to a friend that President Grant had compromised his office by his “indiscreet acceptance” of gifts from Fisk and Gould and that any investigation of “Black Friday” would lead “into the parlor of the President.” The plot to corner the gold market was only the first of several scandals that rocked the Grant administration. The secretary of war, it was revealed, had accepted bribes from merchants who traded with Indians at army posts in the West. In St. Louis, whiskey ­distillers—​­dubbed the “whiskey ring” in the p ­ ress—​­bribed federal agents in an effort to avoid taxes, bilking the government out of millions of dollars in revenue. Grant’s personal secretary was embroiled in the scheme, caught taking secret payments for confidential information he shared. Various congressional committees investigated most of the scandals, but uncovered no evidence that Grant was involved; his poor choice of associates, however, earned him widespread criticism. Democrats scolded Republicans for their “monstrous corruption and extravagance” and reinforced the public suspicion that elected officials were less servants of the people than they were s­ elf-​­serving bandits.

The Grant Administration  733


 the money supply

 Complex financial ­issues—​­especially monetary p ­ olicy—​­dominated Grant’s presidency. Prior to the Civil War, the economy operated on a gold standard; state banks issued paper money that could be exchanged for an equal value of gold coins. So both gold coins and state bank notes circulated as currency. Greenbacks (so called because of the dye color used on the printed dollars) were issued during the Civil War to help pay for the war. When a nation’s supply of money grows faster than the economy itself, prices for goods and services increase (inflation). This happened when the greenbacks were issued. After the war, the U.S. Treasury assumed that the greenbacks would be recalled from circulation so that consumer prices would decline and the nation could return to a “­hard-​­money” c­ urrency—​­gold, silver, and copper ­coins—​­which had always been viewed as more reliable in value than paper currency. The most vocal supporters of a return to “hard money” were eastern creditors (mostly bankers and merchants) who did not want their debtors to pay them in paper currency. Critics of the gold standard tended to be farmers and other debtors. These s­ o-​­called s­ oft-​­money advocates opposed taking greenbacks out of circulation because shrinking the supply of money would bring lower prices (deflation) for their crops and livestock, thereby reducing their income and making it harder for them to pay their l­ong-​­term debts. In 1868 congressional supporters of such a “­soft-​­money” ­policy—​­mostly ­Democrats—​ ­forced the Treasury to stop withdrawing greenbacks. President Grant sided with the “­hard-​­money” camp. On March 18, 1869, he signed the Public Credit Act, which said that the investors who purchased government bonds to help finance the war effort must be paid back in gold. The Public Credit Act led to a decline in consumer prices that hurt debtors and helped creditors. It also ignited a ferocious political debate over the merits of “hard” and “soft” money that would last throughout the nineteenth ­century—​ a­ nd beyond.

 financial panic

 President Grant’s effort to withdraw the greenbacks from circulation unintentionally helped cause a major economic collapse. During 1873, two dozen overextended railroads stopped paying their bills, forcing Jay Cooke and Company, the nation’s leading business lender, to go bankrupt and close its headquarters’ doors in Philadelphia on September 18, 1873. The shocking news created a snowballing effect as h ­ ard-​­pressed banks began shutting down. A Republican senator sent President Grant an urgent telegram from New York City: “Results of today indicate imminent danger of general national bank panic.”

 734  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 The resulting Panic of 1873 triggered a deep depression. Tens of thousands of businesses closed, millions of workers lost their jobs, and those with jobs saw their wages slashed. In the major cities, the unemployed and homeless roamed the streets and formed long lines at charity soup kitchens. The depression led the U.S. Treasury to reverse course and begin printing more greenbacks. For a time, the supporters of paper money celebrated, but in 1874, Grant, after a period of agonized reflection, overruled his cabinet and vetoed a bill to issue even more greenbacks. His decision pleased the financial community but also ignited a barrage of criticism. A prominent Republican, Edwards Pierrepont, telegraphed Grant that his veto represented “the bravest battle and biggest victory of your life.” A Tennessee Republican congressman, however, called the veto of the currency bill “­cold-​­blooded murder.” In the end, Grant’s decision only prolonged what was then the worst depression in the nation’s history.

 liberal republicans

 The sudden collapse of the economy in 1873 helped further distract northerners from the controversy over reconstructing the South and divided Republicans into two warring factions: the Liberals (or Conscience Republicans) and the Capitalists (or Stalwart Republicans). The Liberal Republicans, led by senators Charles Sumner and Carl Schurz, called for the “best elements” in both national parties to join together. Their goal was to oust the “tyrannical” Grant from the presidency, end federal Reconstruction efforts in the South, lower the tariffs intended to line the pockets of big corporations, and promote “civil service reforms” to end the “partisan tyranny” of the “patronage system” whereby new presidents rewarded the “selfish greed” of political supporters with federal government jobs. The Liberal Republicans charged that Grant and his cronies were pursuing policies and making decisions solely to benefit themselves, putting profits above principles. In 1872, the breakaway Liberal Republicans, many of whom were newspaper editors suspicious of the “working classes,” held their own national convention in Cincinnati, at which they accused the Grant administration of corruption, incompetence, and “despotism.” They then committed political suicide by nominating an unlikely and ­ill-​­suited presidential candidate: Horace Greeley, the editor of the New York Tribune and a longtime champion of a variety of causes: abolitionism, socialism, vegetarianism, and spiritualism. His image as an eccentric who repeatedly reversed his political positions was complemented by his record of hostility to the Democrats, whose support the Liberal Republicans needed if they were going to win the election. The Democrats nevertheless gave their nomination to Greeley. Southern Democrats liked his criticism of federal reconstruction policies in the South.

The Grant Administration  735


 His New York Tribune, for example, claimed that “ignorant, superstitious, ­semi-​­barbarian” former slaves were “extremely indolent, and will make no exertion beyond what is necessary to obtain food enough to satisfy their hunger.” Moreover, Radical Republicans had given the vote to “ignorant” former slaves whose “Nigger Government” exercised “absolute political supremacy” in several states and was transferring the wealth from the “most intelligent” and “influential” southern whites to themselves. Georgia Democrat Robert Toombs, a former Confederate official, agreed with Greeley and his newspaper, arguing that the “dangerous, irresponsible element” among the lower classes was threatening to “attack the interests of the landed proprietors.” Most northerners, however, were appalled at Greeley’s candidacy. By nominating Greeley, said the New York Times, the Liberal Republicans and Democrats had killed any chance of electoral victory. In the 1872 balloting, Greeley carried only six southern states and none in the North. Grant won t­hirty-​ ­one states and carried the national election by 3,598,235 votes to Greeley’s 2,834,761. An exhausted Greeley confessed that he was “the worst beaten man who ever ran for high office.” He died three weeks later. Grant was delighted that the “soreheads and thieves who had deserted the Republican party” were defeated, and he promised to be a better president by avoiding the “mistakes” he had made in his first term as a novice statesman.

 white terror

 President Grant initially fought hard to enforce federal efforts to reconstruct the postwar South. But southern resistance to “Radical rule” increased and turned brutally violent. In Grayson County, Texas, a white man and two friends murdered three former slaves because they wanted to “thin the niggers out and drive them to their holes.” Klansmen focused their program of murder, violence, and intimidation on prominent Republicans, black and ­white—​­elected officials, teachers in black schools, state militias. They intentionally avoided clashes with federal troops. In Mississippi, they killed a black Republican leader in front of his family. Three white “scalawag” Republicans were murdered in Georgia in 1870. That same year an armed mob of whites assaulted a Republican political rally in Alabama, killing four blacks and wounding ­fifty-​­four. An Alabama Republican pleaded with President Grant to intervene against the Klansmen. “Give us poor people some guarantee of our lives,” G. T. F. Boulding wrote. “We are hunted and shot down as if we were wild beasts.” In South Carolina, white supremacists were especially a­ ctive—​­and violent. In 1871, some 500 masked men laid siege to South Carolina’s Union County jail and eventually lynched eight black prisoners. In March 1871, the Klan killed thirty African Americans in Meridian, Mississippi. General William T. Sherman reported that the violence across the South was c­ ommonplace and went

 736  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 unpunished: “Any Southern citizen may kill or abuse a Negro or Union man [Republican] with as much safety as one of our frontiersmen may kill an Indian.” At the urging of President Grant, Republicans in Congress responded with three Enforcement Acts (1870–1871). The first of these measures imposed penalties on anyone who interfered with any citizen’s right to vote. The second dispatched federal supervisors and marshals to monitor elections in southern districts where political terrorism flourished. The third, called the Ku Klux Klan Act, outlawed the main activities of the K ­ KK—​­forming conspiracies, wearing disguises, resisting officers, and intimidating officials. In general, however, the Enforcement Acts were not consistently enforced. As a result, the efforts of southern whites to use violence to thwart Reconstruction escalated. On Easter Sunday in 1873 in Colfax, Louisiana, a mob of white vigilantes, most of them ­ex-​­Confederate soldiers disappointed by local election results, used a cannon, rifles, and pistols to attack a group of black Republicans in the courthouse, slaughtering e­ ighty-​­one and burning down the building. It was the bloodiest racial incident during the Reconstruction period.

A
Visit from the Ku Klux Klan African Americans in the South lived in constant fear of racial violence, as this 1872 engraving from Harper’s Weekly, published to elicit Northern sympathy, illustrates. 
The Grant Administration  737


 southern “redeemers”

 The Ku Klux Klan’s impact on southern politics varied from state to state. In the Upper South, it played only a modest role in helping Democrats win local elections. In the Lower South, however, Klan violence and intimidation had more serious effects. In overwhelmingly black Yazoo County, Mississippi, vengeful whites used terrorism to reverse the political balance of power. In the 1873 elections, for example, the Republicans cast 2,449 votes and the Democrats 638; two years later the Democrats polled 4,049 votes, the Republicans 7. Throughout the South, the activities of white supremacists disheartened black and white Republicans alike. “We are helpless and unable to organize,” wrote a Mississippi scalawag. We “dare not attempt to canvass [campaign for candidates], or make public speeches.” At the same time, northerners displayed a growing weariness with using federal troops to reconstruct the South. “The plain truth is,” noted the New York Herald, “the North has got tired of the Negro.” President Grant, however, desperately wanted to use more federal force to preserve peace and asked Congress to pass new legislation that would “leave my duties perfectly clear.” Congress responded with the Civil Rights Act of 1875, the most comprehensive guarantee of civil rights to that point. It said that people of all races must be granted equal access to hotels and restaurants, railroads and stagecoaches, theaters, and other places of public entertainment. Unfortunately for Grant, however, the new law provided little authority to enforce its provisions. Those who felt their rights were being violated had to file suit in court, and the penalties for violators were modest. Public interest in protecting civil rights in the South continued to wane as other issues emerged to distract northerners. Western expansion, Indian wars, and economic issues surged to the forefront of voter concerns. Republican political control in the South gradually loosened as ­ all-​ ­white “Conservative” parties mobilized the a­ nti-​­Reconstruction vote. White D ­ emocrats—​­the ­so-​­called redeemers who supposedly “saved” the South from Republican control and “black rule”—used the race issue to excite the white electorate and intimidate black voters. Where persuasion failed to work, Democrats used trickery. As one enthusiastic Democrat boasted, “The white and black Republicans may outvote us, but we can outcount them.” Republican political control ended in Virginia and Tennessee as early as 1869; in Georgia and North Carolina, it collapsed in 1870, although North Carolina had a Republican governor until 1876. Reconstruction lasted longest in the Lower South, where whites abandoned Klan robes for barefaced intimidation in paramilitary groups such as the Mississippi Rifle Club and the South

 738  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 Carolina Red Shirts. The last Radical Republican regimes collapsed, however, after the elections of 1876, and the return to power of the old white political elite in the South further undermined the country’s commitment to Congressional Reconstruction.

 the contested election of 1877

 President Grant wanted to run for an unprecedented third term in 1876, but many Republicans had lost confidence in his leadership. In the summer of 1875, Grant acknowledged the inevitable, announced that he would retire, and admitted that he had entered the White House with “no political training” and had made “errors in judgment.” James Gillespie Blaine of Maine, former Speaker of the House, was the likeliest Republican to succeed Grant, but his candidacy crumbled when it was revealed that he had promised political favors to railroad executives in exchange for shares of stock in the company. The scandal led the Republican convention to pass over Blaine in favor of Ohio’s favorite son, Rutherford B. Hayes. Elected governor of Ohio three times, most recently as a “hard money” gold advocate, Hayes also was a civil service reformer eager to reduce the number of federal jobs subject to political appointment. But his chief virtue was that he offended neither Radicals nor reformers. As a journalist put it, he was “obnoxious to no one.” The Democratic convention was uncharacteristically harmonious from the start. On the second ballot, the nomination went to Samuel J. Tilden, a wealthy corporate lawyer and reform governor of New York. The 1876 campaign avoided controversial issues. Both candidates favored relaxing federal military authority in the South. In the absence of strong ideological differences, Democrats highlighted the scandals embroiling the Republicans. In response, Republicans avoided discussion of the depression and repeatedly waved “the bloody shirt,” linking the Democrats to secession, civil war, and the violence committed against Republicans in the South. As Robert G. Ingersoll, the most celebrated Republican public speaker of the time, insisted: “The man that assassinated Abraham Lincoln was a Democrat. . . . Soldiers, every scar you have on your heroic bodies was given you by a Democrat!” Despite the lack of major issues, the 1876 election generated the most votes of any national election in U.S. history to that point. Early returns pointed to a victory for Tilden. Nationwide, he outpolled Hayes by almost 300,000 votes; by midnight following Election Day, Tilden had won 184 electoral votes, just one short of the total needed for victory. Overnight, however, Republican activists realized that the election hinged on 19 disputed electoral votes from Florida, Louisiana, and South Carolina.

The Grant Administration  739


THE ELECTION OF 1876

WA TERR. OR 2 1

 CA

 NV

MT TERR. ID TERR.

UT TERR.

AZ TERR.

WY TERR.

 NH 5 VT 5 DAKOTA TERR.

 MN

 NE

CO NM TERR.

KS INDIAN TERR. TX

Rutherford B. Hayes (Republican)


 WI

IA MO AR LA

 IL

 MA 13

 NY

MI IN

 ME

 OH

 PA

 WV 5 VA KY 12 NC TN 12 SC GA MS AL

 RI 4 CT 6 NJ 9 DE 3 MD 8

 FL

Electoral Vote


Popular Vote




4,036,000




4,301,000


 Disputed; assigned to Hayes by the Electoral Commission Samuel J. Tilden (Democrat)

■
■
■


 Why did the Republicans pick Rutherford Hayes as their presidential candidate? Why were the electoral votes of several states disputed? What was the Compromise of 1877?

 WWN64

Figure M16_2
 1st proof The Democrats

 needed only one of the challenged votes to claim victory; the Republicans needed all nineteen. Republicans in those key states had engaged in election fraud, while Democrats had used physical intimidation to keep black voters at home. But all three states were governed by a Republican who appointed the election boards, each of which reported narrow victories for Hayes. The Democrats immediately challenged the results. In all three states, rival election boards submitted conflicting vote counts. The nation watched and wondered as days, then weeks, passed with no solution. On January 29, 1877, Congress set up an electoral commission to settle the dispute. It met daily for weeks trying to verify the disputed vote counts.

 740  CHAPTER 16  The Era of R ­ econstruction

 The Compromise of 1877 This illustration represents the compromise between Republicans and southern Democrats that elected Rutherford B. Hayes and ended Radical Reconstruction.

 Finally, on March 1, 1877, the commission voted 8 to 7 in favor of Hayes. The next day, the House of Representatives declared Hayes president by an electoral vote of 185 to 184. Tilden decided not to protest the decision. His campaign manager explained that they preferred “four years of Hayes’s administration to four years of civil war.” Hayes’s victory hinged on the defection of key southern Democrats, who, it turned out, had made a number of secret deals with the Republicans. On February 26, 1877, prominent Ohio Republicans and powerful southern ­ Democrats struck a private ­bargain—​­the Compromise of 1877—at Wormley’s Hotel in Washington, D.C. The Republicans promised that if Hayes were named president, he would remove the last federal troops from the South.

 the end of reconstruction

 In 1877, newly inaugurated President Hayes withdrew federal troops from Louisiana and South Carolina, whose Republican governments collapsed soon thereafter. Hayes insisted that it was not his fault: “The practical destruction of the Republican organization in the South was accomplished before my southern policy was announced.” Over the next thirty years, the protection of black civil rights in the South crumbled. As Henry Adams, a former Louisiana slave, observed in 1877, “The whole ­South—​­every state in the S­ outh—​­has got [back] into the hands of the

 Reconstruction’s Significance  741

 very men that held us as slaves.” New white state governments rewrote their constitutions, rid their administrations of “carpetbaggers, scalawags, and blacks,” and cut spending. “The Yankees helped free us, so they say,” a former North Carolina slave named Thomas Hall remembered, “but [in 1877] they let us be put back in slavery again.”

 Reconstruction’s Significance Congressional Reconstruction gave African Americans an opportunity to experience ­freedom—​­but not security or equality. As Thomas Hall noted in acknowledging the end of Reconstruction, African Americans were still dependent “on the southern white man for work, food, and clothing,” and most southern whites remained hostile to the notion of civil rights and social equality. The collapse of Congressional Reconstruction in 1877 had tragic consequences, as the South aggressively renewed traditional patterns of discrimination against African Americans. Black activist W. E. B. DuBois called the effort to make slaves into citizens a “splendid failure.” Yet for all of the unfulfilled promises of Congressional Reconstruction, it left an enduring ­legacy—​­the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth Amendments. If Reconstruction’s experiment in interracial democracy did not provide true social equality or substantial economic opportunities for African Americans, it did create the essential constitutional foundation for future advances in the quest for equality and civil ­rights—​­and not just for African Americans, but for women and other minority groups. Until the pivotal Reconstruction era, the states were responsible for protecting citizens’ rights. Thereafter, thanks to the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments, blacks had gained equal rights (in theory), and the federal government had assumed responsibility for ensuring that states treated blacks equally. A hundred years later, the cause of civil rights would be embraced again by the federal g­ overnment—​­this time permanently.

CHAPTER REVIEW
Summary • 
 Reconstruction Challenges With the defeat of the Confederacy and the passage of the Thirteenth Amendment, the federal government had to develop policies and procedures to address a number of vexing questions: What was the status of the defeated states and how would they be reintegrated into the nation’s political life? What would be the political status of the former slaves and what would the federal government do to integrate them into the nation’s social and economic fabric?

•


 Reconstruction over Time Abraham Lincoln and his successor, southerner Andrew Johnson, wanted a lenient plan for Reconstruction. The Freedmen’s Bureau helped to educate and aid freed slaves, negotiate labor contracts, and reunite families. Lincoln’s assassination led many northerners to favor the Radical Republicans, who wanted to end the grasp of the old plantation elite on the South’s society and economy. Whites resisted and established black codes to restrict the freedom of former slaves. Congressional Reconstruction responded by stipulating that former Confederate states had to ratify the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments to the U.S. Constitution to protect the rights of African Americans. Congress also passed the Military Reconstruction Act, which used federal troops to enforce the voting and civil rights of African Americans.

•


 Views of Reconstruction Many former slaves found comfort in their families and in the churches they established, but land ownership reverted to the old white elite, reducing newly freed blacks to sharecropping. African Americans enthusiastically participated in politics, with many serving as elected officials. Along with white southern Republicans (scalawags) and northern carpetbaggers, they worked to rebuild the southern economy. Many white southerners, however, supported the Ku Klux Klan’s violent intimidation of the supporters of Reconstruction and pursued “redemption,” or white Democratic control of southern state governments.

•


Political and Economic Developments and the End of Reconstruction ­
 Scandals during the Grant administration involved an attempt to corner the gold market, and the “whiskey ring’s” plan to steal millions of dollars in tax revenue. In the face of these troubles and the economic downturn caused by both the Panic of 1873 and disagreement over whether to continue the use of greenbacks or return to the gold standard, northern support for the status quo in government eroded and weakened Reconstruction. Southern white “redeemers” were elected in 1874, ­successfully reversing the political progress of Republicans and blacks. In the Compromise of 1877, Democrats agreed to the election of Republican Rutherford B. Hayes, who put an end to the Radical Republican administrations in the southern states.

•


 The Significance of Reconstruction Southern state governments quickly renewed ­long-​­standing patterns of discrimination against African Americans, but the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments remained enshrined in the Constitution, creating the essential constitutional foundation for future advances in civil rights.



Chronology
April 14, 1865


­


















 Congress sets up the Freedmen’s Bureau Lincoln assassinated Johnson issues Proclamation of Amnesty All-​­white southern state legislatures pass various “black codes” Ku Klux Klan organized Congress passes the Civil Rights Act Congress passes the Military Reconstruction Act Fourteenth Amendment is ratified The U.S. House of Representatives impeaches President Andrew Johnson; the Senate fails to convict him Grant elected president Eight former Confederate states readmitted to the Union Reestablishment of white conservative rule (“redeemers”) in some former Confederate states Fifteenth Amendment ratified First Enforcement Acts passed in response to white terror in the South Grant wins reelection Panic of 1873 triggers depression Compromise of 1877 ends Reconstruction; Hayes becomes president

Key Terms
Radical Republicans p. 705


 sharecropping p. 724

 Freedmen’s Bureau p. 706

 Ku Klux Klan (KKK) p. 728

 Johnson’s Restoration Plan p. 712

 greenbacks p. 733

 black codes p. 714

Panic of 1873 p. 734


Fourteenth Amendment (1866) p. 714


 redeemers p. 737

Congressional Reconstruction p. 715


Compromise of 1877 p. 740


Fifteenth Amendment (1870) p. 718


IJK
Go to InQuizitive to see what you’ve learned—and learn what you’ve missed—with personalized feedback along the way. 


•


 pa r t f ive

GROWING PAINS
The defeat of the Confederacy in 1865 restored the Union and, in the process, helped ­accelerate America’s transformation into an agricultural empire and an ­industrial powerhouse. A stronger sense of nationalism began to replace the regional ­conflicts of the prewar era. During and after the Civil War, the ­­Republican-​­led Congress pushed through legislation to promote industrial and commercial development and western expansion at the same time that it was “reconstructing” the former Confederate states. The United States forged a dynamic new industrial ­economy serving an increasingly national and international market for 
 American goods. Yet, that progress, and the process of settling the rest of the continent, was tarnished by the relentless and ruthless relocation of Native Americans onto reservations and the exploitation of the continent’s natural resources. Fueled by innovations in mass production and mass marketing, and by advances in transportation and communications such as transcontinental railroads and transatlantic telegraph systems, huge corporations began to dominate the economy by the end of the nineteenth century. As the prominent social theorist William Graham Sumner remarked, the process of industrial development “controls us all because we are all in it. It creates the conditions of our own existence, sets the limits of our social activity, and regulates the bonds of our social relations.” ­Late-​­nineteenth-​­century American life drew much of its energy from the mushrooming industrial cities. “This is the age of cities,” declared Midwestern writer Hamlin Garland. “We are now predominantly urban.” But the transition from an economy made up of mostly small local and regional businesses to one dominated by ­large-​­scale national and international corporations affected rural life as well. As early as 1869, novelist Harriet Beecher Stowe reported that the “simple, pastoral” America “is a thing forever gone. The hurry of railroads, and the rush and roar of business” had displaced the Jeffersonian ideal of America as a nation of small farms. She exaggerated, of course. Small farms and small towns survived the impact of the Industrial Revolution, but farm folk, as one New Englander stressed, must now “understand farming as a business; if they do not it will go hard with them.” The friction between the new forces of the national marketplace and the traditional folkways of ­small-​­scale family farming generated social unrest and political revolts (what one writer called “a seismic shock, a cyclonic violence”) during the last quarter of the nineteenth century. The clash between tradition and modernity, sleepy farms and bustling c­ ities, peaked during the 1890s, one of the most ­strife-​­ridden decades in American history. A deep economic depression, political activism by farmers, and ­ violent conflicts between industrial ­ workers and employers transformed the presidential campaign of 1896 into a clash between rival visions of America’s future.

﻿  747


 The Republican candidate, William McKinley, campaigned on modern urban and industrial values. By contrast, William Jennings Bryan, the nominee of both the Democratic and the Populist parties, was an eloquent defender of America’s rural past. McKinley’s victory proved to be a turning point in American political and social history. By 1900, the United States had emerged as one of the world’s greatest industrial powers, and it would thereafter assume a new leadership role in world ­affairs—​­for good and for ill.





Business and
Labor in the
­Industrial Era
1860–1900


 Carnegie Steel Company Steelworkers operate the massive and dangerous Bessemer converters at Andrew Carnegie’s huge steel mill in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.

T


 he Civil War devastated the economy of the South. In the North, however, the need to supply the massive Union armies with shoes, boots, uniforms, weapons, supplies, food, wagons, and railroads ushered in an era of unprecedented industrial development. The scope of the war favored ­large-​­scale business enterprises and hastened the maturation of a truly national economy. An Indiana congressman told business leaders in 1864 that the war effort had sparked the development of “resources and capabilities such as you never before dreamed you possessed.” During the war years, the number of manufacturing companies in the United States almost doubled. In 1865, Ohio’s John Sherman, a powerful U.S. senator, wrote a letter to his brother, William T. Sherman, the celebrated Union general, in which he observed that the northern states had emerged from the war “unimpaired.” The process of m ­ ass-​­producing mountains of goods for the war effort had given a widened “scope to the ideas of leading capitalists, far higher than anything undertaken in this country. They talk of millions as confidently as before [they talked] of thousands.” Between the end of the war and 1900, America experienced explosive growth. The nation’s population tripled, agricultural production more than doubled, and manufacturing output grew six times over. When the Civil War ended there was not a single industrial corporation listed on the New York Stock Exchange. By 1900, there were dozens of them employing hundreds of thousands of managers, clerks, and workers. In the t­hirty-​­five years after the Civil War, the United States achieved the highest rate of economic growth in

 focus questions 1. What primary factors stimulated the unprecedented industrial and agricultural growth in the late nineteenth century?

 2. Who were the leading entrepreneurs who pioneered the growth of Big Business? What were their goals and what strategies did they use to dominate their respective industries?

 3. What role did the federal government play in the nation’s economic development during this period?

 4. In what ways did the social class structure and lives of women change in the late nineteenth century?

 5. How effective were the efforts of workers to organize unions to promote their interests during this era?



